Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-8,112
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Nebraska Teacher Recruitment and Retention Act is to provide financial incentives to recruit and retain teachers in Nebraska classrooms.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 44.
January 1, 2028